Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1189XS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 124 Section 1. Section 622.63, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 622.63 Subpoenas. 3 1. The clerks of the several courts shall, on application 4 of any person having a cause or matter pending in court, issue 5 a subpoena for witnesses under the seal of the court, inserting 6 all the names required by the applicant in one subpoena, if 7 practicable, which may be served by the sheriff of the county, 8 or by the party or any other person. 9 2. No subpoena shall be issued or served for the purpose 10 of seeking menstrual health data as defined in section 808.2, 11 subsection 2. 12 Sec. 2. Section 808.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 808.2 Authorization. 15 1. A search warrant may be issued: 16 1. a. For property which has been obtained in violation of 17 law. 18 2. b. For property, the possession of which is unlawful. 19 3. c. For property used or possessed with the intent to be 20 used as the means of committing a public offense or concealed 21 to prevent an offense from being discovered. 22 4. d. For any other property relevant and material as 23 evidence in a criminal prosecution. 24 2. No search warrant shall be issued for the search and 25 seizure of menstrual health data stored on a computer, computer 26 network, or other device containing electronic or digital 27 information. For purposes of this subsection, âmenstrual health 28 dataâ means any information, recorded in any form or medium, 29 that is created or received by an entity that relates to or is 30 used to determine, predict, or estimate the past, present, or 31 future menstrual health or menstrual status of an individual. 32